dictsource/kaa_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Karakalpak language

.replace
// Replace Cyrillic script to Latin script
    а    a
    ә    á
    б    b
    в    v
    г    g
    ғ    ǵ
    д    d
    е    e
    ё    yo
    ж    j
    з    z
    и    i
    й    y
    к    k
    қ    q
    л    l
    м    m
    н    n
    ң    ń
    о    o
    ө    ó
    п    p
    р    r
    с    s
    т    t
    у    u
    ү    ú
    ў    w
    ф    f
    х    x
    ҳ    h
    ц    c
    ч    ch
    ш    sh
    щ    sch
    ы    ı
    ь    ʼ
    ъ    ʼ
    э    e
    ю    yu
    я    ya

.group a
    a    A

.group á
    á    &

.group b
    b    b

.group v
    v    v

.group g
    g    g

.group ǵ
    ǵ    G

.group d
    d    d

.group e
    e    e

.group j
    j    Z

.group z
    z    z

.group i
    i    I

.group y
    y    j

.group k
    k    k

.group q
    q    q

.group l
    l    l

.group m
    m    m

.group n
    n    n

.group ń
    ń    N

.group o
    o    o

.group ó
    ó    8

.group p
    p    p

.group r
    r    *

.group s
    s    s
    sch  SS
    sh   S

.group t
    t    t

.group u
    u    U

.group ú
    ú    u#

.group w
    w    w

.group f
    f    f

.group x
    x    x

.group h
    h    h

.group c
    c    ts
    ch   tS

.group ı
    ı    @

.group
    ʻ     ?
    ş     S
    ç     tS
